Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0231.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 805. (1) The board of mechanical rules created in section 3 of former 1984 PA 192 shall continue continues in existence and is designated as the board for purposes of this article. (2) The board shall consist of the state fire marshal or the state fire marshal's designee, who is a permanent member, and 14 12 residents of the this state, appointed by the governor. All of the following apply to the appointed members of the board: (a) An appointed member shall must be at least not less than 18 years old.of age. (b) Except for the representative of the general public, an appointed member shall must be qualified in his or her the appointed member's respective field. (c) The appointed members of the board shall must include all of the following: (i) An individual representing the general public. (ii) A member of organized labor who represents the mechanical trades. (ii) A mechanical contractor with an HVAC classification who is licensed under this article. (iii) A mechanical contractor with a fire suppression classification who is licensed under this article. (iv) A mechanical contractor with a refrigeration classification who is licensed under this article. (v) (iii) A professional mechanical engineer who is licensed under article 20 of the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 339.2001 to 339.2014, as a professional engineer. (iv) A representative of an energy-producing public utility of the state. (v) A representative from each of the work classifications described in section 807(2). (vi) (vi) Two chief One mechanical inspectors inspector of a governmental subdivisions, 1 of whom enforces the building officials and code administrators building code, and 1 of whom enforces the international conference of building officials building code.subdivision. (vii) A water tube or fire tube boiler manufacturer. (viii) A member of organized labor who represents the mechanical trades. (ix) A member of organized labor who represents a relevant trade in this state. (x) A member of organized labor in this state that engages in the design, erection, fabrication, installation, operation, repair, or inspection of boilers. (xi) A mechanical contractor with experience in boiler installation, piping, operations, and repair, or a member who represents owners and users of power boilers that operate at least 1,000 pounds-force per square inch. (xii) A member who has experience with antique steam boilers as that term is defined in section 901. (3) At the first meeting of each year, the board shall elect from its the board's membership a vice-chairperson and secretary. The vice-chairperson and secretary shall be are elected from those the members appointed to the board by the governor, except that the board members who are chief mechanical inspectors are not eligible for election as vice-chairperson of the board. The governor shall designate 1 member of the board to serve as chairperson at the pleasure of the governor. (4) Eight A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. An approval, decision, or ruling of the board does not become is not effective unless approved by 2/3 of the board members attending a meeting. (5) The board may recommend to the state construction code commission the promulgation of rules the board considers necessary for the safe design, construction, installation, alteration, servicing, and inspection of systems used in compliance with the Michigan mechanical code, and may recommend modifications, additions, or deletions to this act to update and maintain this act as an effective and enforceable instrument. The board may also recommend to the state construction code commission, after testing and evaluating a material, product, method of manufacture, or method of construction or installation for acceptability under the state construction code, that the commission issue a certificate of acceptability for that material, product, or method.